Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.160

Legal services revolving fund—Transfers and payments into fund—Allotments to attorney general.

The amounts to be disbursed from the legal services revolving fund from time to time shall be transferred thereto by the state treasurer from funds appropriated to any and all agencies for legal services or administrative expenses on a quarterly basis. Agencies operating in whole or in part from nonappropriated funds shall pay into the legal services revolving fund such funds as will fully reimburse funds appropriated to the attorney general for any legal services provided activities financed by nonappropriated funds.

The director of financial management shall allot all such funds to the attorney general for the operation of his or her office, pursuant to appropriation, in the same manner as appropriated funds are allocated to other agencies headed by elected officers under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5056; 1979 c 151 s 94; 1974 ex.s. c 146 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 146: See note following RCW 43.10.150.